Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5486.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5-60-10 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-60 entitled "Athletic
Trainers" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-60-10. Qualifications of athletic trainers.
(a) An applicant for an athletic trainer license must possess one of the following
qualifications:
(1) Give proof of graduation from an accredited college or university and have met the
following minimum athletic-training-curriculum requirements established by the board, by
completing the following specific course requirements:
(i) Human anatomy;
(ii) Human physiology;
(iii) Physiology of exercise;
(iv) Applied anatomy and kinesiology;
(v) Psychology (2 courses);
(vi) First aid and CPR;
(vii) Nutrition;
(viii) Remedial exercise;
(ix) Personal, community, and school health;
(x) Techniques of athletic training;
(xi) Advanced techniques of athletic training; and

(xii) Clinical experience in accordance with national standards and as approved by the
director.
(2) Show proof acceptable to the board of education and experience of equal caliber to that
specified in subsection (a)(1).
(3) Have passed the required examination approved by the department.
(b) On and after January 1, 2004, an applicant for initial licensure shall be required to
demonstrate:
(1) Proof of graduation from an accredited college or university and shall have met
minimum athletic training requirements as established by department regulation; and
(2) Proof of having passed the required examination, approved by the department, and shall
have been certified by the national certifying body recognized by the National Athletic Trainers
Association (NATA).
(c) On and after September 1, 2025, as a condition for issuance or maintaining a license
issued pursuant to § 5-60-9, an athletic trainer shall successfully complete training and be issued a
certificate pursuant to the provisions of § 23-6.4-6. Provided, however, no existing state funds or
appropriations of state funds shall be used for the training or supplies required pursuant to this
subsection.
SECTION 2. Chapter 5-60 of the General Laws entitled "Athletic Trainers" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
5-60-10.1. Trained and equipped with epi-pen requirements.
On and after September 1, 2025, every athletic trainer licensed pursuant to § 5-60-9 shall
be trained and equipped with an epinephrine auto-injector while performing the duties of an athletic
trainer. Provided, however, no existing state funds or appropriations of state funds shall be used for
the training or supplies required pursuant to this section.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001024/SUB A
========
LC001024/SUB A - Page 2 of 3